de: Fidget-Mechanismus des sensorischen Spielzeugs: Klicken; Kneten/Formen; Magnetisch; Murmel/Bahn; Ploppen (Blase); Rätseln/Zerlegen; Rollen; Einrasten/Umklappen; Drehen; Drücken/Quetschen; Dehnen; Verdrehen; Andere
el: Μηχανισμός νευρικότητας αισθητηριακού παιχνιδιού: Κλικ; Ζύμωμα/πλάσιμο; Μαγνητικό; Βόλος/ράγα; Ποπ (φούσκα); Παζλ/αποσυναρμολόγηση; Κύλιση; Κούμπωμα/αναδίπλωση; Περιστροφή; Ζούληγμα/αποσυμπίεση; Τέντωμα; Στρίψιμο; Άλλο
fr: Mécanisme de manipulation du jouet sensoriel: Clic; Pétrissage/moulage; Magnétique; Bille/circuit; Pop (bulle); Puzzle/démontage; Roulement; Pression/bascule; Rotation; Pression/anti-stress; Étirement; Torsion; Autre
hr-HR: Osjetna igračka s mehanizmom za vrpolje: Klik; Gnječenje/oblikovanje; Magnetsko; Kuglica/staza; Pucketanje (mjehurić); Slagalica/rastavljanje; Kotrljanje; Kopčanje/okretanje; Vrtnja; Stiskanje/antistres; Rastezanje; Uvijanje; Ostalo
hu: Szenzoros játék matatómechanizmusa: Kattintós; Gyúrható / Formázható; Mágneses; Golyós / Pályás; Pukkanós (buborékos); Kirakós / Szétszerelhető; Görgethető; Pattintós / Átfordítható; Pörgetős; Nyomogatható / Stresszoldó; Nyújtható; Csavarható; Egyéb
ko: 감각 장난감 피젯 메커니즘: 클릭; 반죽하기/모양 만들기; 마그네틱; 구슬/트랙; 팝(버블); 퍼즐/분해; 롤; 스냅/플립; 스핀; 쥐어짜기/스트레스 풀기; 늘이기; 비틀기; 기타
sv: Fidgetmekanism för sensorisk leksak: Klicka; Knåda/forma; Magnetisk; Kula/bana; Poppa (bubbla); Pussel/ta isär; Rulla; Knäppa/vända; Snurra; Klämma/stress; Töja; Vrida; Övrigt
ro-RO: Mecanism de tip jucărie antistres al jucăriei senzoriale: Clic; Frământare/modelare; Magnetic; Bilă/pistă; Pop (bulă); Puzzle/dezasamblare; Rulare; Închidere/întoarcere; Rotire; Strângere/stres; Întindere; Răsucire; Altele
lt-LT: Sensorinio žaislo judinimo mechanizmas: Spustelėjimas; Minkymas / formavimas; Magnetinis; Rutuliukas / takelis; Sprogdinimas (burbulų); Dėlionė / išardymas; Ridenimas; Spragtelėjimas / apvertimas; Sukimas; Gniaužymas / spaudimas; Tampymas; Sukiojimas; Kita
vi: Đồ chơi cảm giác, cơ chế giảm căng thẳng: Nhấp; Nhào/nặn; Nam châm; Viên bi/rãnh; Bóp (bóng); Xếp hình/tháo rời; Lăn; Bấm/lật; Quay; Bóp/nhấn; Kéo giãn; Vặn; Khác
nl: Sensorisch speelgoed fidgetmechanisme: Klikken; Kneden/vormen; Magnetisch; Knikker/baan; Pop (bubbel); Puzzelen/demonteren; Rollen; Vastklikken/omdraaien; Draaien; Knijpen/stress; Utrekken; Twisten; Overig
tr: Duyusal oyuncak stres atma mekanizması: Tıklama; Yoğurma/Şekillendirme; Manyetik; Bilye/Ray; Patlatma (baloncuk); Yapboz/Parçalara ayırma; Yuvarlama; Çıtlatma/Döndürme; Döndürme; Sıkma/Stres; Esnetme; Bükme; Diğer
da: Sanselegetøjs fidget-mekanisme: Klik; Ælte/forme; Magnetisk; Kugle/bane; Pop (boble); Puslespil/skille ad; Rulle; Klikke/vende; Snurre; Klemme/stress; Strække; Vride; Andet
pt-BR: Brinquedo sensorial mecanismo de manipulação: Clique; Amassar/Moldar; Magnético; Bolinha de gude/Trilha; Pop (bolha); Quebra-cabeça/Desmontar; Rolar; Estalo/Giro; Girar; Apertar/Estresse; Esticar; Torcer; Outro
bg-BG: Сензорна играчка с механизъм за въртене: Щракане; Мачкане/оформяне; Магнит; Топче/писта; Пукане (мехурче); Пъзел/разглобяване; Търкаляне; Щракване/превъртане; Въртене; Стискане/натиск; Разтягане; Усукване; Друго
en: Sensory toy fidget mechanism: Click; Knead/Mold; Magnetic; Marble/Track; Pop (bubble); Puzzle/Disassemble; Roll; Snap/Flip; Spin; Squeeze/Stress; Stretch; Twist; Other
sl-SI: Fidget mehanizem senzorične igrače: Klikanje; Gnetenje/oblikovanje; Magnetno; Kroglica/steza; Pokanje mehurčkov; Sestavljanje/razstavljanje; Kotaljenje; Pregibanje/stiskanje; Vrtenje; Stiskanje/antistres; Raztezanje; Zvijanje; Drugo
zh-CN: 感官玩具解压机制: 按压咔嗒; 揉捏/塑形; 磁力; 弹珠/轨道; 按压（泡泡）; 拼图/拆卸; 滚动; 扣合/翻转; 旋转; 挤压/解压; 拉伸; 扭转; 其他
cs: Hmatový mechanismus smyslové hračky: Cvakání; Hnětení/tvarování; Magnetické; Kulička/dráha; Praskání (bublin); Skládání/rozebírání; Rolování; Lupání/překlápění; Točení; Mačkání/antistresové; Natahování; Kroucení; Jiné
it: Meccanismo antistress del giocattolo sensoriale: Clic; Da impastare/modellare; Magnetico; Biglia/Binario; Scoppio (bolla); Rompicapo/Da smontare; Rotolamento; Scatto/Capovolgimento; Rotazione; Da spremere/Antistress; Allungamento; Torsione; Altro
nb: Fidgetmekanisme for sensorisk leketøy: Klikk; Kna/forme; Magnetisk; Klinkekule/spor; Popp (boble); Pusle/demontere; Rull; Knekk/vipp; Spinn; Klem/stress; Strekk; Vri; Annet
ja: 感覚刺激玩具のフィジェットメカニズム: クリック; 練る/成形する; マグネット; ビー玉/トラック; ポップ (バブル); パズル/分解; ロール; スナップ/フリップ; スピン; スクイーズ/ストレス; ストレッチ; ツイスト; その他
zh-TW: 感官玩具舒壓機制: 點擊; 揉捏/塑形; 磁性; 彈珠/軌道; 戳壓 (泡泡); 拼圖/拆解; 滾動; 扣合/翻轉; 旋轉; 擠壓/紓壓; 拉伸; 扭轉; 其他
sk-SK: Mechanizmus antistresovej senzorickej hračky: Klikanie; Miesenie/tvarovanie; Magnetické; Guľôčka/dráha; Pukanie (bubliny); Skladanie/rozkladanie; Gúľanie; Cvaknutie/preklápanie; Točenie; Stláčanie (antistresové); Naťahovanie; Krútenie; Iné
fi: Fidget-lelumekanismi: Napsautus; Vaivaaminen/muovailu; Magneettinen; Kuula/rata; Poksautus (kupla); Pulma/purkaminen; Pyöritys; Napsautus/kääntö; Pyöriminen; Puristus/stressi; Venytys; Vääntö; Muu
ru: Механизм антистресса сенсорной игрушки: Щелчок; Разминание/лепка; Магнит; Шарик/трек; Лопанье пузырьков; Головоломка/разборка; Вращение/катание; Защелкивание/переворачивание; Кручение; Сжатие/антистресс; Растягивание; Скручивание; Другое
es: Mecanismo antiestrés de juguete sensorial: Clic; Amasar/moldear; Magnético; Canica/pista; Estallar (burbuja); Rompecabezas/desarmar; Rodar; Chasquear/girar; Girar; Apretar/antiestrés; Estirar; Torcer; Otro
th: ของเล่นเสริมพัฒนาการทางประสาทสัมผัสพร้อมกลไกคลายเครียด: คลิก; นวด/ปั้น; แม่เหล็ก; ลูกแก้ว/ราง; กดป๊อป (ฟองอากาศ); จิ๊กซอว์/ถอดประกอบ; กลิ้ง; ดัน/พลิก; หมุน; บีบ/คลายเครียด; ยืด; บิด; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Mecanismo de agitação do brinquedo sensorial: Clique; Amassar/moldar; Magnético; Berlinde/pista; Rebentar (bolha); Quebra-cabeças/desmontar; Rolar; Estalar/virar; Girar; Apertar/anti-stress; Esticar; Torcer; Outro
pl: Mechanizm poruszania się zabawki sensorycznej: Klikanie; Ugniatanie/kształtowanie; Magnetyczne; Kulka/tor; Wciskanie bąbelków; Układanie/rozmontowywanie; Toczenie; Przekładanie/pstrykanie; Kręcenie; Ściskanie; Rozciąganie; Przekręcanie; Inne